Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202686-1037
Committee, defined.

Committee means the 911 Service System Advisory Committee.

Laws 2018, LB993, § 10;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-1006.01;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 19.